New York, session 2025-2026, S6514.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The state finance law is amended by adding a new section 2 179-ff to read as follows: 3 § 179-ff. Coordination plans; gun violence reduction. Notwithstanding 4 any provision of law, rule or regulation to the contrary, any state 5 agency that issues an RFP relating to gun violence reduction shall 6 establish a coordination plan including all awardees. Such coordination 7 plans shall be in a form as prescribed by the department of state. At a 8 minimum, such coordination plan shall help ensure complete coverage of 9 the area for which such RFP is issued and minimize competition between 10 awardees. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10973-01-5